da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør > Tilbehør til strygeinstrumenter > Buekasser til strengeinstrumenter: Dobbelte buekasser; Flere buekasser; Enkelte buekasser
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов > Аксессуары для оркестровых струнных инструментов > Футляры для смычков для оркестровых струнных инструментов: Футляры для двух смычков; Футляры для нескольких смычков; Футляры для одного смычка
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Zenekarivonóshangszer-kiegészítők > Zenekarivonóshangszer-vonótokok: Dupla vonótokok; Többszörös vonótokok; Egyedüli vonótokok
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala > Pribor za orkestralna žičana glazbala > Koferi za gudala orkestralnih žičanih glazbala: Kutije s dva luka; Kutije s više lukova; Kutije s jednim lukom
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre > Étuis pour archets: Étuis à double archet; Étuis à archet multiples; Étuis à archet unique
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră > Cutii pentru arcușuri instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră: Cutii pentru arcușuri duble; Cutii pentru arcușuri multiple; Cutii pentru un singur arcuș
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke koncertním smyčcovým nástrojům > Pouzdra na smyčce: Pouzdra na dva smyčce; Pouzdra na více smyčců; Pouzdra na jeden smyčec
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda para orquestras > Estojos para arcos de instrumentos de corda: Estojos para arco duplo; Estojos para vários arcos; Estojos para arco simples
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品 > オーケストラ弦楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器弓ケース: ダブルボウケース; マルチプルボウケース; シングルボウケース
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr > Futerały na smyczki: Futerały na dwa smyczki; Futerały na wiele smyczków; Futerały na jeden smyczek
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai > Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų priedai > Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų strykų dėklai: Dvigubi strykų dėklai; Kelių strykų dėklai; Vieno stryko dėklai
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas > Acessórios de instrumento de cordas de orquestra > Estojos para arcos de instrumento de cordas de orquestra: Estojos para arco duplo; Estojos para vários arcos; Estojos para arco individual
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente > Zubehör für Streichinstrumente & Harfen > Bogenkästen für Streichinstrumente: Doppelbogenkästen; Multibogenkästen; Einzelbogenkästen
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา > กล่องเก็บคันสีของเครื่องสายวงออร์เคสตรา: กล่องคันสีแบบคู่; กล่องคันสีแบบหลายชิ้น; กล่องคันสีแบบเดี่ยว
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala > Dodatki za orkestrska godala > Kovčki za loke za orkestrska godala: Kovčki za dva loka; Kovčki za več lokov; Kovčki za en lok
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件 > 管弦弦樂器配件 > 琴弓盒: 雙琴弓盒; 多琴弓盒; 單琴弓盒
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件 > 管弦乐器配件 > 管弦乐器弓盒: 双弓盒; 多弓盒; 单弓盒
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten > Accessoires voor strijkinstrumenten > Koffers voor snaarinstrumenten: Dubbele koffers; Meerdere koffers; Losse koffers
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter > Tilbehør til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter > Bueesker til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter: Dobbeltbuevesker; Vesker for flere buer; Enkeltbuevesker
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet > Orkestraaliset jousisoitin­tarvikkeet > Jousisoitinten jousikotelot: Kahden jousen kotelot; Monen jousen kotelot; Yhden jousen kotelot
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти > Аксесоари за оркестрови струнни инструменти > Калъфи за лъкове за оркестрови струнни инструменти: Двойни калъфи за лъкове; Калъфи за няколко лъка; Единични калъфи за лъкове
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje > Príslušenstvo k orchestrálnym sláčikovým nástrojom > Puzdrá na orchestrálne sláčikové nástroje: Dvojpriehradkové puzdra; Viacpriehradkové puzdra; Jednopriehradkové puzdra
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây > Phụ kiện nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc > Hộp đựng vĩ của nhạc cụ dây: Hộp đựng hai vĩ; Hộp đựng nhiều vĩ; Hộp đựng một vĩ
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων > Θήκες δοξαριών ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων: Διπλές θήκες δοξαριού; Πολλαπλές θήκες δοξαριού; Μονές θήκες δοξαριού
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories > Orchestral String Instrument Accessories > Orchestral String Instrument Bow Cases: Double Bow Cases; Multiple Bow Cases; Single Bow Cases
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta > Estuches para arcos de instrumentos de cuerda: Estuches para arcos dobles; Estuches para múltiples arcos; Estuches para un solo arco
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Çantaları: Çift Yay Çantaları; Çoklu Yay Çantaları; Tek Yay Çantaları
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda > Accessori per strumenti ad arco > Custodie per archetti di strumenti a corda: Custodie per doppio archetto; Custodie per archetti multipli; Custodie per archetto singolo
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품 > 오케스트라 현악기 부대용품 > 오케스트라 현악기 활 케이스: 활 케이스(더블); 활 케이스(멀티); 활 케이스(싱글)
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument > Tillbehör till orkesterstränginstrument > Bågfodral till stränginstrument: Dubbla rosettfodral; Flera rosettfodral; Enkla rosettfodral